North Carolina, session 2025, SB710.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. ALARMS SYSTEMS LICENSING ACT MODERNIZATION
SECTION 1.(a) Chapter 74D of the General Statutes reads as rewritten:
"Chapter 74D.
"Alarm Security Systems.
"Article 1.
"Alarm Security Systems Licensing Act.
"§ 74D-1. Title.
This act may be cited as the "Alarm "Security Systems Licensing Act."
"§ 74D-2. License Business and qualifying agent license requirements.
(a) License Required. – No person, firm, association, corporation, or department or
division of a firm, association or corporation, shall engage in or hold itself out as engaging in an
alarm a security systems business without first being licensed in accordance with this Chapter.
A department or division of a firm, association, or corporation may be separately licensed under
this Chapter if the distinct department or division, as opposed to the firm, association, or
corporation as a whole, engages in an alarm a security systems business. The department or
division shall ensure strict confidentiality of private security information, and the private security
information of the department or division must, at a minimum, be physically separated from other
premises of the firm, association, or corporation. For purposes of this Chapter an "alarm a
"security systems business" is defined as any person, firm, association or corporation that does
any of the following:
(1) Sells Unless otherwise exempt, sells or attempts to sell an alarm a security
system device by engaging in a any personal solicitation at a residence or
business to advise, design, or consult on specific types and specific locations
of alarm security system devices.
(2) Installs, Unless otherwise exempt, installs, services, monitors, or responds to
electrical, wireless or hardwired electronic or mechanical alarm signal
devices, devices and security systems, integrated automation of a residence or
business that includes a security element, burglar alarms, monitored access
control, or cameras cameras, analytic capturing devices, systems providing
intelligence or other imaging devices used to detect or observe burglary,
*S710-v-6*

breaking or entering, intrusion, shoplifting, pilferage, theft, or other
unauthorized or illegal activity. This provision shall not apply to a locking
device that records entry and exit data and does not transmit the data in real
time to an on-site or off-site monitoring location, provided the installer is duly
licensed by the North Carolina Locksmith Licensing Board.
…
(c) Qualifying Agent. – A business entity that engages in the alarm systems business is
required to be licensed under this Chapter is subject to all of the requirements listed in this
subsection with respect to a qualifying agent. For purposes of this Chapter, a "qualifying agent"
is an individual who is a full-time employee in a management position who is licensed under this
Chapter and whose name and address have been registered with the Board. The requirements are:
(1) The business entity shall employ a designated qualifying agent who meets the
requirements for a license issued under and who is, in fact, licensed under the
provisions of this Chapter, unless otherwise approved by the Board. Service
upon the qualifying agent appointed by the business entity of any process,
notice or demand required by or permitted by law to be served upon the
business entity by the Alarm Security Systems Licensing Board shall be
binding upon the licensed business entity. Nothing herein contained shall limit
or affect the right to serve any process, notice or demand required or permitted
by law to be served upon a business entity in any other manner or hereafter
permitted by law.
…
(3) In the event that the qualifying agent upon whom the business entity relies in
order to do business ceases to perform his duties as qualifying agent, the
business entity shall notify the board in writing by letter or using the Board's
online form within 10 working days. The business entity must obtain a
substitute qualifying agent within 90 days after the original qualifying agent
ceases to serve as qualifying agent. The Director, in his or her discretion, may
extend the 90-day period for good cause by an additional 30 days upon a
written request of an officer of the company.
(4) The license certificate shall list the name of the qualifying agent. No licensee
person shall serve as the qualifying agent for more than one business entity
without the prior approval of the Board.
…
(6) The qualifying agent shall be responsible for maintaining a current address
and other contact information with the Board.
(d) Criminal Record Check. Minimum Qualifications for Security Systems License. – An
applicant must for qualifying agent shall meet all of the following requirements and qualifications
determined by a background investigation conducted by the Board in accordance with
G.S. 74D-2.1 and upon receipt of an application:qualifications:
(1) The applicant is at least 18 years of age.
(2) The applicant is of good moral character and temperate habits. The following
shall be prima facie evidence that the applicant does not have good moral
character or temperate habits: conviction by any local, State, federal, or
military court of any crime involving the illegal use, carrying, or possession
of a firearm; conviction of any crime involving the illegal use, possession,
sale, manufacture, distribution or transportation of a controlled substance,
drug, narcotic, or alcoholic beverages; conviction of a crime involving
felonious assault or an act of violence; conviction of a crime involving
unlawful breaking or entering, burglary, larceny, or of any offense involving
moral turpitude; or a history of addiction to alcohol or a narcotic drug;
Page 2 Session Law 2025-51 Senate Bill 710

provided that, for purposes of this subsection, "conviction" means and
includes the entry of a plea of guilty, plea of no contest, or a verdict rendered
in open court by a judge or jury.jury, including a prayer for judgment
continued, adjudication withheld, or equivalent.
(3) The applicant has the necessary training, qualifications and experience to be
licensed.licensed, or the applicant has successfully completed or kept current
a Certified Alarm Technician Level I course offered by the Electronic Security
Association or equivalent course approved by the Board.
(e) Examination. – The Board may require the applicant to demonstrate the applicant's
qualifications by examination.
…
(g) An alarm monitoring company located in another state and licensed by that state
which demonstrates to the Board's satisfaction that it does not conduct any business through a
personal representative present in this State, but which solicits and conducts business solely
through interstate communication facilities, such as telephone, the internet, and the United States
Postal Service, upon receipt by the Board of a certificate of good standing from the state of
licensure is not required to register employees pursuant to G.S. 74D-8. Out-of-state monitoring
companies not licensed in any state must be licensed by the Board and must register employees
pursuant to G.S. 74D-8.
(h) A security guard and patrol company licensed under Chapter 74C of the General
Statutes that remotely monitors access control, cameras, analytic capturing devices, systems
providing intelligence, or other imaging devices shall obtain a separate limited monitoring license
and may utilize the same qualifying agent for the limited license as utilized for its security guard
and patrol license and shall not be required to meet the requirements of G.S. 74D-2(c)(4) and
(d)(3) or hold a low voltage electrical license. The qualifying agent must successfully complete
a central station monitoring operator course approved by the Board.
"§ 74D-2.1. Criminal background checks.
(a) Authorization. – Upon receipt of an application for a license or registration, the Board
shall conduct a background investigation to determine whether the applicant meets the
requirements for a license or registration as set out in G.S. 74D-2(d). The Department State
Bureau of Public Safety Investigation may provide a criminal record check to the Board for a
person who has applied for a new or renewal license or registration through the Board. The Board
shall provide to the Department of Public Safety, State Bureau of Investigation, along with the
request, the fingerprints of a new applicant, and the Department of Public Safety State Bureau of
Investigation shall provide a criminal record check based upon the applicant's fingerprints. The
Board may request a criminal record check from the Department of Public Safety State Bureau
of Investigation for a renewal applicant based upon the applicant's fingerprints in accordance
with policy adopted by the Board. The Board shall provide any additional information required
by the Department of Public Safety State Bureau of Investigation and a form signed by the
applicant consenting to the check of the criminal record and to the use of the fingerprints and
other identifying information required by the State or national repositories. The applicant's
fingerprints shall be forwarded to the State Bureau of Investigation for a search of the State's
criminal history record file, and the State Bureau of Investigation shall forward a set of the
fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history check. The
Department of Public Safety State Bureau of Investigation may charge each applicant a fee to be
collected by the Board and transmitted to the State Bureau of Investigation for conducting the
checks of criminal history records authorized by this subsection.
The Board may require a new or renewal applicant to obtain a criminal record report from
one or more reporting services designated by the Board to provide criminal record reports.
Applicants are required to pay the designated reporting service for the cost of these reports.
Senate Bill 710 Session Law 2025-51 Page 3

(b) Confidentiality. – The Except as necessary to support the denial of an application or
a disciplinary matter in a contested case, the Board shall keep all information obtained pursuant
to this section confidential in accordance with applicable State law and federal guidelines, and
the information shall not be a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.
"§ 74D-3. Exemptions.
The provisions of this Chapter shall not apply to:to the following:
(1) A person, firm, association or corporation that sells or manufactures alarm
security systems, unless the person, firm, association or corporation makes
personal solicitations at a residence or business to advise, design, or consult
on specific types and specific locations of alarm security system devices,
installs, services, monitors, or responds to alarm security systems at or from a
protected premises or a premises to be protected and thereby obtains
knowledge of specific application or location of the alarm security system. A
person licensed under this Chapter may hire a consultant to troubleshoot a
location or installation for a period of time not to exceed 48 hours in a
one-month period if the licensee submits a report to the Board within 30 days
from the date of the consultation designating the consultant as a temporary
consultant;
(2) Installation, servicing or responding to fire alarm systems or any alarm device
which is installed in a motor vehicle, aircraft or boat;boat.
(3) Installation or service of an alarm electronic security system on property
owned by or leased to the installer;installer.
(4) An alarm monitoring company located in another state which demonstrates to
the Board's satisfaction that it does not conduct any business through a
personal representative present in this State but which solicits and conducts
business solely through interstate communication facilities such as telephone
messages, earth satellite relay stations and the United States postal service;
and
(5) A person or business providing alarm systems services to a State agency or
local government if that person or business has been providing those services
to the State agency or local government for more than five years prior to the
effective date of this Chapter, and the State agency or local government joins
with the person or business in requesting the application of this exemption.
(6) Installation or service of a locking device that records entry and exit data and
does not transmit the data in real time to an on-site or off-site monitoring
location, provided the installer is licensed by the North Carolina Locksmith
Licensing Board.
(7) An entity through which a customer accesses marketing or advertising
material or installation instructions for a security system.
(b) A person licensed under this Chapter may utilize a consultant or manufacturer's
representative to troubleshoot a location or installation if accompanied by the licensee and the
licensee submits a report to the Board within 30 days from the date of the consultation designating
the consultant as a temporary consultant.
"§ 74D-4. Alarm Security Systems Licensing Board.
(a) The Alarm Security Systems Licensing Board is hereby established.
(b) The Board shall consist of seven members: the Secretary of Public Safety or his or
her designee; two persons appointed by the Governor, one of whom shall be licensed under this
Chapter and one of whom shall be a public member; two persons appointed by the General
Assembly upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate in accordance
with G.S. 120-121, one of whom shall be licensed under this Chapter and one of whom shall be
a public member; and two persons appointed by the General Assembly upon the recommendation
Page 4 Session Law 2025-51 Senate Bill 710

of the Speaker of the House of Representatives in accordance with G.S. 120-121, one of whom
shall be licensed under this Chapter and one of whom shall be a public member.
(c) Each member shall be appointed for a term of three years and shall serve until a
successor is installed. No With the exception of the Secretary or his or her designee, no member
shall serve more than two complete three-year consecutive terms. The term of each member,
other than the Attorney General or his designee, who is serving on August 7, 1989, shall terminate
on June 30, 1989. Of the appointments made by the General Assembly upon the recommendation
of the President of the Senate to begin on July 1, 1989, one member shall be for a term of one
year and one member shall be for a term of three years. Of the appointments made by the General
Assembly upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives, one member
shall be appointed for a term of two years and one member shall be appointed for a term of three
years. Thereafter all terms shall be for three years.
…
(e) Board members who are also State officers or employees shall receive no per diem
compensation for serving on the Board, and shall only receive the travel allowances set forth in
G.S. 138-6. All other Board members shall receive reimbursement in accordance with
G.S. 93B-5(b) and, notwithstanding G.S. 93B-5(a), shall receive as compensation for their
services per diem not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each day during which they
are engaged in the official business of the Board. The Board shall set the travel allowance and
per diem compensation of Board members who are not also State officers or employees.
(f) The Board shall elect a chairman chair and a vice-chairman vice-chair from its
membership by majority vote at the first meeting of its fiscal year. The vice-chairman vice-chair
shall serve as chairman chair of the screening committee and shall also serve as chairman chair
in the chairman's chair's absence. At no time shall both the positions of chairman chair and
vice-chairman vice-chair be held by either an industry representative or a nonindustry
representative.
(g) The Board shall meet at the call of the chairman chair or a majority of the members
of the Board. The Board shall adopt rules governing the call and conduct of its meetings. A
majority of the current Board membership constitutes a quorum.
"§ 74D-5. Powers of the Board.
(a) In addition to the powers conferred upon the Board elsewhere in this Chapter, the
Board shall have the power to:to do the following:
(1) Promulgate rules necessary to carry out and administer the provisions of this
Chapter including the authority to require the submission of reports and
information by licensees under this Chapter;Chapter.
(2) Determine minimum qualifications and establish minimum education,
experience, and training standards for applicants and licensees applicants,
licensees, and registrants under this Chapter;Chapter.
(3) Conduct investigations regarding alleged violations and make evaluations as
may be necessary to determine if unlicensed individuals or entities are in
violation of this Chapter and licensees and registrants under this Chapter are
complying with the provisions of this Chapter;Chapter. The Board shall issue
cease and desist orders, in writing, for violations of this Chapter with the
concurrence of the Secretary of Public Safety.
(4) Adopt and amend bylaws, consistent with law, for its internal management
and control;control.
(5) Investigate and approve individual applicants to be licensed or registered
according to this Chapter;Chapter.
(6) Deny, suspend, or revoke any license issued or to be issued under this Chapter
to any applicant or licensee applicant, licensee, or registrant who fails to
satisfy the requirements of this Chapter or the rules established by the Board.
Senate Bill 710 Session Law 2025-51 Page 5

The denial, suspension, or revocation of such license or registration shall be
in accordance with Chapter 150B of this General Statutes of North
Carolina;Carolina.
(7) Issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of
pertinent books, accounts, records, and documents. The district court shall
have the power to impose punishment pursuant to G.S. 5A-21 et seq. for acts
occurring in matters pending before the Board which would constitute civil
contempt if the acts occurred in an action pending in court; andcourt.
(8) Contract for services as necessary to carry out the functions of the Board.
(9) Acquire, hold, rent, encumber, alienate, and otherwise deal with real property
in the same manner as a private person or corporation, subject only to approval
of the Governor and the Council of State. Collateral pledged by the Board for
an encumbrance is limited to the assets, income, and revenues of the Board.
(b) The chairman chair of the Board or his or her representative designated to be a hearing
officer may conduct any hearing called by the board Board for the purpose of denial, suspension,
or revocation of a license or registration under this Chapter.
(c) The regulation of security system businesses shall be exclusive to the Board; however,
any city or county shall be permitted to require a security business operating within its
jurisdiction to register and to supply information regarding its license and may adopt an ordinance
to require users of electronic security systems to obtain revocable permits when alarm usage
involves automatic signal transmission to a law enforcement agency.
"§ 74D-5.1. Position of Director created.
The position of Director of the Alarm Security Systems Licensing Board is hereby created
within the Department of Public Safety. The Secretary of Public Safety shall appoint a person to
fill this full-time position. The Director's duties shall be to administer the directives contained in
this Chapter and the rules promulgated adopted by the Board to implement this Chapter and to
carry out the administrative duties incident to the functioning of the Board in order to actively
police the alarm systems security systems industry to insure ensure compliance with the law in
all aspects. The Director may issue a temporary grant or denial of a request for registration subject
to final action by the Board at its next regularly scheduled meeting.
"§ 74D-5.2. Investigative powers of the Secretary of Public Safety.
The Secretary of Public Safety shall have the power to investigate or cause to be investigated
any complaints, allegations, or suspicions of wrongdoing or violations of this Chapter involving
individuals unlicensed, licensed, or to be licensed, under this Chapter. Any investigation
conducted pursuant to this section is deemed confidential and is not subject to review under
G.S. 132-1 until the investigation is complete and a report is presented to the Board. However,
the report may be released to the licensee after the investigation is complete but before the report
is presented to the Board.
"§ 74D-6. Denial of a license or registration.
Upon a finding that the applicant meets the requirements for licensure or receipt of an
application for licensure or registration under this Chapter, the Board shall determine whether
the applicant shall receive the license or registration applied for. The grounds for denial
include:include all of the following:
(1) Commission of some act which, if committed by a registrant or licensee,
would be grounds for the suspension or revocation of a registration or license
under this Chapter;Chapter.
(2) Conviction of a crime involving fraud;the illegal use, carrying, or possession
of a firearm, felonious assault or an act of violence, felonious sexual offense,
felonious larceny, or felonious fraud. For purposes of this subdivision,
"conviction" means and includes the entry of a plea of guilty, plea of no
Page 6 Session Law 2025-51 Senate Bill 710

contest, or a verdict entered in open court by a judge or jury, including a prayer
for judgment continued, adjudication withheld, or equivalent.
(3) Lack of good moral character or temperate habits. The following
misdemeanor convictions shall be prima facie evidence that the applicant does
not have good moral character or temperate habits: conviction by any local,
State, federal, or military court of any crime involving the illegal use, carrying,
or possession of a firearm; conviction of any crime involving the illegal use,
possession, sale, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a controlled
substance, drug, narcotic, or alcoholic beverages; conviction of a crime
involving felonious assault or an act of violence; conviction of a crime
involving unlawful breaking or entering, burglary or larceny or of any offense
involving moral turpitude; larceny; conviction of a crime involving a sexual
offense; or a history of addiction to alcohol or a narcotic drug; provided that,
for purposes of this subsection subdivision, "conviction" means and includes
the entry of a plea of guilty, plea of no contest, or a verdict rendered in open
court by a judge or jury;jury, including a prayer for judgment continued,
adjudication withheld, or equivalent.
(4) Previous denial under this Chapter or previous revocation for cause;cause.
(5) Knowingly making any false statement or misrepresentation in an application
made to the Board for a license or registration.
(6) Being a registered sex offender in this State or any other state.
"§ 74D-7. Form of license; term; assignability; renewal; posting; branch offices; fees.
…
(c) No licensee shall engage in any business regulated by this Chapter under a name other
than the licensee licensee's name or names which appear on the certificate issued by the Board.
(d) Any branch office of an alarm in this State with a security systems business shall
obtain a branch office certificate. A separate certificate stating the location and licensed
qualifying agent shall be posted at all times in a conspicuous place in each branch office. Every
business covered under the provisions of this Chapter shall file in writing with the Board the
addresses of each of its branch offices. offices in this State. All licensees of with a branch office
shall notify the Board in writing before the establishment, closing, or changing of the location of
any branch office. A licensed qualifying agent may be responsible for more than one branch
office of an alarm systems business with the prior approval of the Board. office in this State.
Temporary approval may be granted by the Director, upon application of the qualifying agent,
for a period of time not to exceed 10 working 45 days after the adjournment of the next regularly
scheduled meeting of the Board unless the Board determines that the application should be
denied.
…
"§ 74D-8. Registration of persons employed.
(a) (1) A licensee of an alarm a security systems business shall register with the
Board within 30 days after the employment begins, all of the following
licensee's employees described in subdivision (1a) of this subsection that are
within the State, unless in the discretion of the Director, the time period is
extended for good cause:cause.
(1a) The following employees shall be registered with the Board:
a. Any employee that has access to confidential any information
detailing the design, installation, or application of any location specific
electronic security system or that has access to any code, number, or
program that would allow the system to be modified, altered, or
circumvented.
Senate Bill 710 Session Law 2025-51 Page 7

b. Any employee who conducts personal sales in a private residence or
who installs or services an electronic a security system in a commercial
business establishment or a personal residence.
c. Any employee who remotely monitors a security system, including
cameras, unless the employee is registered as a security guard with a
licensed security guard and patrol company under Chapter 74C of the
General Statutes.
Employees engaged only in sales or marketing that does not involve any of
the above are not required to be registered.
(1a)(1b) To register an employee, a licensee shall submit to the Board as to the
employee: set(s) of classifiable fingerprints on standard F.B.I. applicant cards;
recent color photograph(s) of acceptable quality for identification; and
statements of any criminal records as deemed appropriate by the Board.
(2) Except during the period allowed for registration in subdivision (a)(1) of this
section, no alarm security systems business may employ any employee
required to be registered by this Chapter unless the employee's registration has
been approved by the Board as set forth in this section.
(3) A licensee may employ an applicant for registration as a probationary
employee for 20 consecutive days. Upon completion of the probationary
period and the desire of the licensee to hire the registration applicant as a
regular employee, the licensee shall register the employee, as described in this
subsection, with the Board within 30 days after the probationary employment
period ends unless the Director, in the Director's discretion, extends the time
period for good cause. Before a probationary employee engages in systems
services, the employee shall complete any training requirements and the
licensee shall conduct a criminal record check on the employee, as the Board
deems appropriate. The licensee shall submit a list of the probationary
employees to the Director on a monthly basis. The list shall include the name,
address, social security number, and dates of employment of the employees.
…
"§ 74D-8.1. Apprenticeship registration permit.
(a) The Board may issue an apprenticeship registration permit to an applicant who is 16
or 17 years old and currently enrolled in high school if the applicant holds a valid drivers license
and submits at least three letters of recommendation stating that the applicant is of good moral
character as provided in G.S. 74D-2(d)(2). The letters of recommendation shall be from persons
who are not related to the individual, and at least one of the letters shall be from an official at the
school where the applicant is currently enrolled.applicant.
…
"§ 74D-9. Certificate of liability insurance required; form and approval; suspension for
noncompliance.
…
(d) No license shall be issued under this act unless the applicant files with the Board
evidence of a policy of liability insurance which policy must provide for the following minimum
coverage: fifty two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) ($250,000) because of bodily injury
or death of one person as a result of the negligent act or acts of the principal insured or his agents
operating in the course and scope of his employment; subject to said limit for one person, one
five hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) ($500,000) because of bodily injury or death of two or
more persons as the result of the negligent act or acts of the principal insured or his agent
operating in the course and scope of his or her agency; twenty one hundred thousand dollars
($20,000) ($100,000) because of injury to or destruction of property of others as the result of the
Page 8 Session Law 2025-51 Senate Bill 710

negligent act or acts of the principal insured or his agents operating in the course and scope of
his or her agency.
…
"§ 74D-10. Suspension or revocation of licenses and registrations; appeal.
(a) The Board may, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, suspend or revoke a
license or registration issued under this Chapter if it is determined that the licensee or registrant
has:
…
(3) Violated any rule promulgated adopted by the Board pursuant to the authority
contained in this Chapter.
(4) Been convicted of any crime involving moral turpitude or any other crime
involving violence or the illegal use, carrying, or possession of a dangerous
weapon.felony as set forth in G.S. 74D-6(2) or any crime as set forth in
G.S. 74D-6(3).
…
(7) Engaged in or permitted any employee to engage in any alarm security
systems business when not lawfully in possession of a valid license
registration issued under the provisions of this Chapter.
(8) Committed an unlawful breaking or entering, burglary, larceny, sexual
offense, trespass, fraud, assault, battery, or kidnapping.
(9) Committed any other act which is a ground for the denial of an application for
a license or registration under this Chapter.
(10) Failed to maintain the certificate of liability insurance required by this
Chapter.
…
(15) Engaged in the alarm security systems profession under a name other than the
name under which the license was obtained under the provisions of this
Chapter.
…
(19) Engaged in conduct that constitutes dereliction of duty or otherwise deceives,
defrauds, or harms the public in the course of professional activities or
services.services, including fraudulently claiming a change in business
ownership, fraudulently claiming dissolution of a competing business,
fraudulently claiming to be a representative of the consumer's current service
provider, misrepresentation of employer, or misrepresenting an upgrade of
equipment as a sales tactic.
(20) Demonstrated a lack of financial responsibility.
…
"§ 74D-11. Enforcement.
…
(b) Any person, firm, association, corporation, or department or division of a firm,
association or corporation, or their agents and employees violating any of the provisions of this
Chapter or knowingly violating any rule promulgated to implement this Chapter shall be guilty
of a Class 1 misdemeanor. The Attorney General, or his or her representative, shall have
concurrent jurisdiction with the district attorneys of this State to prosecute violations of this
Chapter.
(c) The regulation of alarm systems businesses shall be exclusive to the Board; however,
any city or county shall be permitted to require an alarm systems business operating within its
jurisdiction to register and to supply information regarding its license, and may adopt an
ordinance to require users of alarm systems to obtain revocable permits when alarm usage
involves automatic signal transmission to a law-enforcement agency.
Senate Bill 710 Session Law 2025-51 Page 9

(d) In lieu of revocation of suspension of a license or registration under G.S. 74D-10, a
civil penalty of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) per violation may be assessed by
the Board against any person that violates any provision of this Chapter or any rule of the Board
adopted pursuant to this Chapter. In determining the amount of any penalty, the Board shall
consider the degree and extent of harm caused by the violation. The clear proceeds of all penalties
collected under this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in
accordance with G.S. 115C-457.2.
(e) Proceedings for the assessment of civil penalties shall be governed by Chapter 150B
of the General Statutes. If the person assessed a penalty fails to pay the penalty to the Board, the
Board may institute an action in the superior court of the county in which the person resides or
has his or her principal place of business to recover the unpaid amount of the penalty. An action
to recover a civil penalty under this section shall not relieve any party from any other penalty
prescribed by law.
(f) The sale, installation, or service of an alarm a security system by an unlicensed or
unregistered person shall constitute a threat to the public safety, and any contract for the sale,
installation, or service of an alarm a security system shall be deemed void and unenforceable.
…
"§ 74D-13. Transfer of funds.
All fees collected pursuant to Chapter 74C of the General Statutes from alarm systems
businesses which have not been expended upon January 1, 1984, shall be transferred to the Board
by the Private Protective Services Board for the purpose of defraying the expenses of
administering this act.
"§ 74D-14. Proof of licensure to maintain or commence action.
An alarm A security systems business may not maintain any action in any court of the State
for the collection of compensation for performing an act for which a license or registration is
required by this Chapter without alleging and proving that the alarm security systems business is
appropriately licensed and the employee or agent of the alarm security systems business is
appropriately registered upon entering into a contract with the consumer. An alarm A security
systems installation, maintenance, or monitoring contract entered into with a consumer shall be
void if the consumer confirms through records maintained by the Board that the alarm security
systems business is not properly licensed or the consumer establishes through records maintained
by the Board that the person enticing the consumer to enter into the contract is not properly
registered by the Board. The sale, installation, or service of an alarm a security system by an
unlicensed entity or unregistered employee shall be deemed an unfair and deceptive trade practice
and shall be actionable under Chapter 75 of the General Statutes.
…."
SECTION 1.(b) Article 2 of Chapter 74D of the General Statutes reads as rewritten:
"Article 2.
"Alarm Security Systems Education Fund.
"§ 74D-30. Alarm Security Systems Education Fund created; payment to Fund;
management; use of funds.
(a) There is hereby created and established a special fund to be known as the "Alarm
"Security Systems Education Fund" (hereinafter Fund) which shall be set aside and maintained
in the office of the State Treasurer. The Fund shall be used in the manner provided in this Article
for the education of licensees and registrants.
…
(c) In addition to the fees provided for elsewhere in this Chapter, the Board shall charge
the following fees which shall be deposited into the Fund:
(1) On July 1, 1985, the Board shall charge every licensee on that date a fee of
fifty dollars ($50.00);
Page 10 Session Law 2025-51 Senate Bill 710

(2) The Board shall charge each new applicant for a license fifty dollars ($50.00),
provided that for purposes of this Article a new applicant is hereby defined as
an applicant who did not possess a license on July 1, 1985; andfifty dollars
($50.00).
(3) The Board is authorized to charge each licensee an additional amount, not to
exceed fifty dollars ($50.00), on July 1 of any year in which the balance of the
Fund is less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).
(d) The State Treasurer shall invest and reinvest the moneys in the Fund in a manner
provided by law. The Board in its discretion, may use the Fund for any of the following purposes:
(1) To advance education and research in the alarm security systems field for the
benefit of those licensed under the provisions of this Chapter and for the
improvement of the industry,industry.
(2) To underwrite educational seminars, training centers and other educational
projects for the use and benefit generally of licensees, andlicensees.
(3) To sponsor, contract for and to underwrite any and all additional educational
training and research projects of a similar nature having to do with the
advancement of the alarm security systems field in North Carolina."
SECTION 1.(c) The Security Systems Licensing Board may adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this Part.
SECTION 1.(d) This Part becomes effective October 1, 2025.
PART II. PRIVATE PROTECTIVE SERVICES BOARD LAWS AMENDMENTS
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 74C-2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 74C-2. Licenses required.
(a) No private person, firm, association, or corporation shall engage in, perform any
services as, or in any way represent or hold itself out as engaging in a private protective services
profession or activity in this State without having first complied with the provisions of this
Chapter. Compliance with the licensing requirements of this Chapter shall not relieve any person,
firm, association or corporation from compliance with any other licensing law.
(b) An individual in possession of a valid private protective services license or private
detective trainee permit issued prior to October 1, 1989, shall not be subject to forfeiture of such
license by virtue of this Chapter. Such license shall, however, remain subject to suspension,
denial, or revocation in the same manner in which all other licenses issued pursuant to this
Chapter are subject to suspension, denial, or revocation.
(c) In its discretion, the Private Protective Services Board may issue a trainee permit in
lieu of a private investigator investigator, polygraph examiner, electronic countermeasures, or
digital forensic examiner license provided that the applicant works under the direct supervision
of a licensee."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 74C-3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 74C-3. Private protective services profession defined.
(a) As used in this Chapter, the term "private protective services profession" means and
includes the following:
…
(6) Security guard and patrol profession. – Any person, firm, association or
corporation that provides a security guard on a contractual basis for another
person, firm, association, or corporation corporation, or unit of government
for a fee or other valuable consideration and performs one or more of the
following functions:
a. Prevention or detection of intrusion, entry, larceny, vandalism, abuse,
fire or trespass on private property.
Senate Bill 710 Session Law 2025-51 Page 11

b. Prevention, observation, or detection of any unauthorized activity on
public or private property.
c. Protection of patrons and persons lawfully authorized to be on the
premises or being escorted between premises of the person, firm,
association, or corporation corporation, or unit of government that
entered into the contract for security services.
d. Control, regulation, or direction of the flow or movement of the public,
whether by vehicle or otherwise, only to the extent and for the time
directly and specifically required to assure the protection of properties.
…
(7) Guard dog service profession. – Any person, firm, association or corporation
which for a fee or other valuable consideration contracts with another person,
firm, association, or corporation corporation, law enforcement agency, or unit
of government to place, lease, rent, or sell a trained dog for the purpose of
protecting lives or property.
…."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 74C-9 reads as rewritten:
"§ 74C-9. Form of license; term; renewal; posting; branch offices; not assignable; late
renewal fee.
…
(e) The Board is authorized to charge reasonable application and license fees as follows:
…
(17) An application for approval of a continuing legal education course not to
exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00).
Except as provided in G.S. 74C-13(k), all fees collected pursuant to this section shall be
expended, under the direction of the Board, for the purpose of defraying the expenses of
administering this Chapter.
…
(h) Trainee permits shall not be issued to applicants that qualify for a private detective
investigator license.
(i) A licensed private detective investigator, polygraph examiner, electronic
countermeasures professional, or digital forensic examiner may supervise no more than five
trainees at any given time."
SECTION 2.(d) G.S. 74C-11 reads as rewritten:
"§ 74C-11. Probationary employees and registration of regular employees; unarmed
security guard guards and unarmed armored car guards required to have
registration card.
(a) All licensees A security guard and patrol company or armored car company may
employ unarmed security guards as probationary employees for 20 consecutive calendar days.
Upon completion of the probationary period and the desire of the licensee security guard and
patrol company or armored car company to hire an unarmed security guard as a regular employee,
the licensee security guard and patrol company or armored car company shall register the
employee who will be engaged in providing private protective services covered by this Chapter
with the Board within 30 days after the probationary employment period ends, unless the
Director, in the Director's discretion, extends the time period, for good cause. Before a
probationary employee engages in private protective services, the employee shall complete any
training requirements, and the licensee shall conduct a criminal record check on the employee,
as the Board deems appropriate. The licensee security guard and patrol company or armored car
company shall submit a list of the probationary employees to the Director on a monthly basis.
The list shall include the name, address, social security number, and dates of employment of the
employees.
Page 12 Session Law 2025-51 Senate Bill 710

To register an employee after the probationary period ends, a licensee security guard and
patrol company or armored car company must give the Board the following:
(1) Set(s) of classifiable fingerprints on standard F.B.I. applicant cards; recent
photograph(s) of acceptable quality for identification; and
(2) Statements of any criminal records obtained from the appropriate authority in
each area where the employee has resided within the immediately 48
preceding months.
(b) A security guard and patrol company or armored car company may not employ an
unarmed security guard in a regular position unless the guard has a registration card issued under
subsection (d) of this section. A person engaged in a private protective services profession section
and may not employ an armed security guard unless the guard has a firearm registration permit
issued under G.S. 74C-13.
(c) The Director shall be notified in writing of the termination of any regular employee
registered under subsection (a) of this section within 10 days after the termination.
(d) An unarmed security guard shall make application to the Director for an unarmed
registration card which the Director shall issue to the applicant after receipt of the information
required to be submitted by the applicant's employer pursuant to subsection (a) of this section,
and after meeting any additional requirements which the Board, in its discretion, deems to be
necessary. The unarmed security guard registration card shall be in the form of a pocket card
designed by the Board, shall be issued in the name of the applicant, and may have the applicant's
photograph affixed to the card. The unarmed security guard registration card shall expire one
year after its date of issuance and shall be renewed every year. The Board may require all
registration holders to complete continuing education courses approved by the Board before
renewal of their registrations. If an unarmed registered security guard is terminated by a licensee
security guard and patrol company or armored car company and changes employment to another
security guard and patrol company, company or armored car company, the security guard's
registration card shall remain valid, provided the security guard pays the unarmed guard
registration transfer fee to the Board and a new unarmed security guard registration card is issued.
An unarmed security guard whose transfer registration application and transfer fee have been
sent to the Board may work with a copy of the transfer application until the registration card is
issued.
(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a licensee security guard and patrol
company or armored car company may employ a person properly registered or licensed as an
unarmed security guard in another state for a period not to exceed 10 days in any given month;
provided the licensee, security guard and patrol company or armored car company, prior to
employing the unarmed security guard, submits to the Director the name, address, and social
security number of the unarmed guard and the name of the state of current registration or
licensing, and the Director approves the employment of the unarmed guard in this State.
(f) Repealed by Session Laws 2005-211, s. 1, effective July 20, 2005.
(g) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, during a disaster declaration or state
of emergency declared by the Governor pursuant to Article 1A of Chapter 166A of the General
Statutes, a licensee security guard and patrol company or armored car company may employ a
person properly registered or licensed as an armed security guard in another state, provided that
the licensee, security guard and patrol company or armored car company prior to deploying the
armed security guard in this State, submit to the Director all of the following:
(1) The name, address, and social security number of the armed security guard.
(2) The name of the state of current registration or licensing of the armed security
guard.
(3) Proof of completion of the 4-hour training course mandated by
G.S. 74C-13(h)(1)a. and 14B NCAC 116 .0807(c)(1), administered by a North
Carolina certified trainer.
Senate Bill 710 Session Law 2025-51 Page 13

(4) Qualification by a firearms instructor certified by the North Carolina Private
Protective Services Board, based on the firearm the armed security guard
intends to carry, meeting the qualification requirements approved by the
Board and the Secretary of Public Safety for each firearm.
(h) The Director may approve the employment of the armed security guard in this State,
if the person meets all of the requirements of subsection (g) of this section. Qualification under
subsection (g) of this section shall be valid for a 12-month period. The duration of the deployment
of an armed security guard from another state by a licensee security guard and patrol company
or armored car company shall not exceed the length of the disaster declaration or state of
emergency."
SECTION 2.(e) G.S. 74C-12 reads as rewritten:
"§ 74C-12. Denial, suspension, or revocation of license, registration, or permit; duty to
report criminal arrests.
(a) The Board may, after compliance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, deny,
suspend or revoke a license, certification, registration or permit issued under this Chapter if it is
determined that the applicant, licensee, trainee, registrant or permit holder has done any of the
following acts:
(1) Made any false statement or given any false information in connection with
any application for a license, registration, certification, or permit permit, or
audit or for the renewal or reinstatement of a license, certification, registration
or permit.
…
(9) Committed an unlawful larceny, burglary, breaking or entering, assault,
battery, sexual offense, kidnapping, forgery, or violated any State or federal
firearms law.
…
(27) Worn, carried, or accepted any badge or shield purporting to indicate that the
person is a law enforcement officer while licensed or registered under the
provisions of this Chapter as a private investigator.Chapter.
…."
SECTION 2.(f) G.S. 74C-13 reads as rewritten:
"§ 74C-13. Armed licensee or registered employee required to have firearm registration
permit; firearms training.
…
(a1) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Armed private investigator. – A licensed private investigator who, at any time,
wears, carries, or possesses a firearm in the performance of duty.
(1a) Armed security guard. – An individual employed by a contract security
company or a proprietary security organization whose principal duty is that of
an armed security watchman; armed armored car service guard; armed alarm
system company responder; or armed courier service who at any time wears,
carries, or possesses a firearm in the performance of duty.
(2) Contract security company. – Any person, firm, association, or corporation
engaging in a private protective services profession that provides services on
a contractual basis for a fee or other valuable consideration to any other
person, firm, association, or corporation.
(3) Proprietary security organization. – Any person, firm, association, or
corporation or department thereof which employs security guards, alarm
responders, armored car personnel, or couriers who are employed regularly
and exclusively as an employee by an employer in connection with the
business affairs of the employer.
Page 14 Session Law 2025-51 Senate Bill 710

(4) Armed armored car guard. – An individual employed by a contract armored
car company, who has a principal duty of an armored car service guard, and
who, at any time, wears, carries, or possesses a firearm in the performance of
duty.
(b) It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, association, or corporation and its agents
and employees to hire an armed security guard or an armed private investigator licensee and
knowingly authorize or permit the armed security guard or armed private investigator licensee to
carry a firearm during the course of performing his or her duties as an armed security guard or
an armed private investigator if the Board has not issued him or her a firearm registration permit
under this section, or if the person, firm, association, or corporation permits an armed security
guard or an armed private investigator licensee to carry a firearm during the course of performing
his or her duties whose firearm registration permit has been suspended, revoked, or has otherwise
expired:
(1) A firearm registration permit grants authority to the armed security guard or
armed private investigator, guard or licensee, while in the performance of his
or her duties or traveling directly to and from work, to carry any firearm
approved by the Board and not otherwise prohibited by law. The use of any
firearm not approved by the Board is prohibited.
(2) All firearms carried by authorized armed security guards or armed licensees
in the performance of their duties shall be owned or leased by the employer.
Personally owned firearms not leased to the employer shall not be carried by
an armed security guard or armed licensee in the performance of his or her
duties.
(c) The applicant for a firearm registration permit shall submit an application to the Board
on a form provided by the Board.
(d) Each firearm registration permit issued under this section to an armed security guard
shall be in the form of a pocket card designed by the Board and shall identify the contract security
company, company, armored car company, or proprietary security organization by whom the
holder of the firearm registration permit is employed. A firearm registration permit issued to an
armed security guard expires one year after the date of its issuance and must be renewed annually
unless the permit holder's employment terminates before the expiration of the permit. The Board
may require all permit holders to complete continuing education courses approved by the Board
before renewal of their permits.
(d1) Each firearm registration permit issued under this section to an armed private
investigator licensee shall be in the form of a pocket card designed by the Board and shall identify
the name of the armed private investigator. licensee. While carrying a firearm and engaged in
private protective services, the armed private investigator licensee shall carry the firearms
registration permit issued by the Board, together with valid identification, and shall disclose to
any law enforcement officer that the person holds a valid permit and is carrying a firearm,
whether concealed or in plain view, when approached or addressed by the law enforcement
officer, and shall display both the permit and the proper identification upon the request of a law
enforcement officer. A private investigator licensee's firearm registration permit expires one year
from the date of issuance and shall be renewed annually. The Board may require all permit
holders to complete continuing education courses approved by the Board before renewal of their
permits.
(d2) A proprietary security organization that employs an armed security guard shall submit
an application to the Board for a license on a form, provided by the Board. A proprietary security
organization shall renew its license every two years.
(e) If an armed security guard terminates his or her employment with the contract security
company company, armored car company, or proprietary security organization, the firearm
Senate Bill 710 Session Law 2025-51 Page 15

registration permit expires and must be returned to the Board within 15 working days of the date
of termination of the employee.
(f) A contract security company company, armored car company, or proprietary security
organization shall be allowed to employ an individual for 30 days as an armed security guard
pending completion of the firearms training required by this Chapter, if the contract security
company company, armored car company, or proprietary security organization obtains prior
approval from the Director. The Board and the Secretary of Public Safety shall provide by rule
the procedure by which an armed private investigator, licensee, a contract security company,
armored car company, or a proprietary security organization applicant may be issued a temporary
firearm registration permit by the Director of the Board pending a determination by the Board of
whether to grant or deny an applicant a firearm registration permit.
(g) The Board may suspend, revoke, or deny a firearm registration permit if the holder or
applicant has been convicted of any crime set forth in G.S. 74C-8(d) or for violation of this
section or rules promulgated by the Board to implement this section. The Director may
summarily suspend a firearm registration permit pending resolution of charges for any of the
offenses set forth in G.S. 74C-12 or any crime set forth in G.S. 74C-8(d).
(h) The Board and the Secretary of Public Safety shall establish a firearms training
program for licensees and registered employees to be conducted by agencies and institutions
approved by the Board and the Secretary of Public Safety. The Board and the Secretary of Public
Safety may approve training programs conducted by a contract security company company,
armored car company, and the security department of a proprietary security organization, if the
contract security company company, armored car company, or security department of a
proprietary security organization offers the courses listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection
and if the instructors of the training program are certified trainers approved by the Board and the
Secretary of Public Safety.
(1) The basic training course approved by the Board and the Secretary of Public
Safety shall consist of a minimum of four hours of classroom training which
shall include all of the following:
a. Legal limitations on the use of firearms and on the powers and
authority of an armed security guard.guards and licensees.
b. Familiarity with this section.
c. Range firing and procedure and firearm safety and maintenance.
d. Any other topics of armed security guard firearms training curriculum
which the Board deems necessary.
(2) An applicant for a firearm registration permit must fire a minimum qualifying
score to be determined by the Board and the Secretary of Public Safety on any
approved target course approved by the Board and the Secretary of Public
Safety.
(3) A firearms registrant must complete a refresher course and shall requalify on
the prescribed target course prior to the renewal of his or her firearm
registration permit.
(4) The Board and the Secretary of Public Safety shall have the authority to
promulgate all rules necessary to administer the provisions of this section
concerning the training requirements of this section.
(i) The Board may not issue a firearm registration permit to an applicant until the
applicant's employer submits evidence satisfactory to the Board that the applicant:
(1) Has satisfactorily completed an approved training course.
(2) Meets all the qualifications established by this section and the rules
promulgated to implement this section.
(3) Is mentally and physically capable of handling a firearm within the guidelines
set forth by the Board and the Secretary of Public Safety.
Page 16 Session Law 2025-51 Senate Bill 710

(j) The Board and the Secretary of Public Safety are authorized to prescribe reasonable
rules to implement this section, including rules for periodic requalification with the firearm and
for the maintenance of records relating to persons issued a firearm registration permit by the
Board.
(k) All fees collected pursuant to G.S. 74C-9(e)(7) and (8) shall be expended, under the
direction of the Board, for the purpose of defraying the expense of administering the firearms
provisions of this Chapter.
(l) The Board and the Secretary of Public Safety shall establish a training program for
certified trainers to be conducted by agencies and institutions approved by the Board and the
Secretary of Public Safety. The Board or the Secretary of Public Safety shall have the authority
to promulgate all rules necessary to administer the provisions of this subsection.
(1) The Board and the Secretary of Public Safety shall also establish renewal
requirements for certified trainers. The Board may require all certified trainers
to complete continuing education courses approved by the Board before
renewal of their certifications.
(2) No certified firearms trainer shall certify a licensee or registrant unless the
licensee or registrant has successfully completed the firearms training
requirements set out above in subsection (h) of this section.
(m) The Board and the Secretary of Public Safety shall establish a training program for
unarmed security guards to be conducted by agencies and institutions approved by the Board and
the Secretary of Public Safety. The Board and the Secretary of Public Safety shall have the
authority to promulgate all rules necessary to administer the provisions of this subsection.
(n) A private investigator licensee shall be permitted to carry a concealed weapon during
the performance of his or her duties as a private investigator private protective services duties
upon: (i) obtaining a concealed weapon handgun permit issued pursuant to G.S. 14-415.11; (ii)
successfully completing the firearms training course approved by the Board and the Secretary of
Public Safety; and (iii) having a notation affixed to the face of the firearms registration card
designating that the armed private investigator licensee is allowed to carry a concealed weapon.
handgun. A private investigator licensee who does not carry a weapon handgun during the course
of his or her duties as a private investigator but who wishes to carry a concealed weapon handgun
while not engaged in private investigative private protective services duties shall be permitted to
do so upon completion of the requirements set forth in Article 54B of Chapter 14 of the General
Statutes.
(o) The Board shall not knowingly issue a firearm registration permit to an individual
who is prohibited by federal or State law from possessing a firearm.
(p) Notwithstanding subsection (n) of this section, a licensee who is authorized pursuant
to section 926B or 926C of Title 18 of the United States Code to carry a concealed handgun and
is in compliance with the requirements of those sections, is exempt from obtaining the permit
described in G.S. 14-415.11."
SECTION 2.(g) The Private Protective Services Board may adopt rules to implement
the provisions of this Part.
SECTION 2.(h) This Part becomes effective October 1, 2025.
PART III. ENHANCE BACKGROUND CHECK ABILITIES OF PRIVATE
PROTECTIVE SERVICES BOARD AND SECURITY SYSTEMS LICENSING BOARD
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 14-415.12 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-415.12. Criteria to qualify for the issuance of a permit.
(a) The sheriff shall issue a permit to an applicant if the applicant qualifies under the
following criteria:
(1) The applicant is a citizen of the United States or has been lawfully admitted
for permanent residence as defined in 8 U.S.C. § 1101(a)(20),and has been a
Senate Bill 710 Session Law 2025-51 Page 17

resident of the State 30 days or longer immediately preceding the filing of the
application.
(2) The applicant is 21 years of age or older.
(3) The applicant does not suffer from a physical or mental infirmity that prevents
the safe handling of a handgun.
(4) The applicant has successfully completed an approved firearms safety and
training course which involves the actual firing of handguns and instruction
in the laws of this State governing the carrying of a concealed handgun and
the use of deadly force. The North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and
Training Standards Commission shall prepare and publish general guidelines
for courses and qualifications of instructors which would satisfy the
requirements of this subdivision. An approved course shall be any course
which satisfies the requirements of this subdivision and is certified or
sponsored by any of the following:
a. The North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training
Standards Commission.
b. The National Rifle Association.
b1. The United States Concealed Carry Association.
c. A law enforcement agency, college, private or public institution or
organization, or firearms training school, taught by instructors
certified by the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and
Training Standards Commission, the United States Concealed Carry
Association, or the National Rifle Association.
d. The North Carolina Private Protective Services Board and Secretary
of Public Safety pursuant to G.S. 74C-13.
Every instructor of an approved course shall file a copy of the firearms course
description, outline, and proof of certification annually, or upon modification
of the course if more frequently, with the North Carolina Criminal Justice
Education and Training Standards Commission."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 15A-151(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 15A-151. Confidential agency files; exceptions to expunction.
(a) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall maintain a confidential file for
expungements containing the petitions granted under this Article and the names of those people
for whom it received a notice under G.S. 15A-150. The information contained in the file may be
disclosed only as follows:
…
(10) Upon request of the North Carolina Private Protective Services Board or the
North Carolina Security Systems Licensing Board, if the criminal record was
expunged under this Chapter for licensure or registration purposes only."
SECTION 3.(c) G.S. 93B-8.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 93B-8.1. Use of criminal history records.
…
(d) This section does not apply to the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and
Training Standards Commission and Commission, the North Carolina Sheriff's Education and
Training Standards Commission.Commission, and the North Carolina Private Protective
Services Board, and the North Carolina Security Systems Licensing Board."
SECTION 3.(d) The Security Systems Licensing Board and the Private Protective
Services Board may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this Part.
SECTION 3.(e) This Part becomes effective October 1, 2025.
PART IV. ENHANCE ABC COMMISSION OVERSIGHT AUTHORITY
Page 18 Session Law 2025-51 Senate Bill 710

SECTION 4.(a) G.S. 18B-203 reads as rewritten:
"§ 18B-203. Powers and duties of the Commission.
(a) Powers. – The Commission shall have authority to:
…
(23) Provide for a method for permittees and applicants to establish compliance
with all local ordinances, and State and federal laws.
…."
SECTION 4.(b) This Part becomes effective October 1, 2025.
PART V. MODIFY LAW REGARDING NOTICE OF CERTAIN VIOLATIONS TO ABC
PERMIT HOLDERS
SECTION 5. G.S. 18B-502(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) If any alcohol law enforcement agent or local ABC officer issues a citation to an
employee of a permitted establishment, who is not the named holder of an ABC permit for the
establishment, for conduct occurring on the premises of the establishment that is a violation of
this Chapter or Chapter 14 of the General Statutes, the alcohol law enforcement agent or local
ABC officer shall send notice by electronic means or certified mail to the holder of the permit
within five business days of the issuance of the citation. Notice to Permit Holders. – If the
Commission receives a report from a law enforcement agency other than the Division of Alcohol
Law Enforcement of the Department of Public Safety or a local ABC officer documenting
violations of this Chapter or Chapter 14 of the General Statutes for conduct occurring on the
premises of a permitted establishment, the Commission shall send notice of the alleged violation
to the holder of the permit within five business days of receipt of the law enforcement agency
report. The written notice shall identify the currently alleged violations and the involved
employee. Nothing in this subsection shall prevent or limit the Commission from taking any
additional action warranted by the circumstances of the violation."
PART VI. REVIEW OF PERSONNEL RECORDS
SECTION 6.(a) Article 1 of Chapter 17C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 17C-10.2. Transfer of certified law enforcement officers.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a North Carolina law enforcement
agency considering an applicant for employment as a sworn law enforcement officer shall request
access to and review the complete personnel file of the applicant maintained by or on behalf of
any North Carolina law enforcement agency where the applicant was employed for any part of
the five-year period preceding the current application.
(b) With a release signed by the applicant, any North Carolina law enforcement agency
or any entity maintaining records of a law enforcement agency that previously employed the
applicant shall grant access to and may, if requested, provide a copy of the applicant's complete
personnel file, including confidential information as defined by G.S. 153A-98, 160A-168, and
126-24 to the law enforcement agency considering the applicant for employment.
(c) To the extent that confidential information as defined by G.S. 153A-98, 160A-168,
or 126-24 is maintained in the personnel file of any law enforcement agency or entity maintaining
records of a law enforcement agency that previously employed the applicant, that information
shall remain confidential in the files of any law enforcement agency obtaining the information
pursuant to this section.
(d) A law enforcement agency, any entity maintaining records of a law enforcement
agency, and the personnel of such agency or entity providing or receiving access to or copies of
an applicant's personnel file pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall not be held
civilly or criminally liable for doing so."
Senate Bill 710 Session Law 2025-51 Page 19

SECTION 6.(b) Article 2 of Chapter 17E of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 17E-7.1. Transfer of certified law enforcement officers.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a sheriff considering an applicant for
employment as a deputy sheriff shall request access to and review the complete personnel file of
the applicant maintained by or on behalf of any North Carolina law enforcement agency where
the applicant was employed for any part of the five-year period preceding the current application.
(b) With a release signed by the applicant, any North Carolina law enforcement agency
or any entity maintaining records of a law enforcement agency that previously employed the
applicant shall grant access to and may, if requested, provide a copy of the applicant's complete
personnel file, including confidential information as defined by G.S. 153A-98, 160A-168, and
126-24 to the sheriff's office considering the applicant for employment.
(c) To the extent that confidential information as defined by G.S. 153A-98, 160A-168,
or 126-24 is maintained in the personnel file of any law enforcement agency or entity maintaining
records of a law enforcement agency that previously employed the applicant, that information
shall remain confidential in the files of any sheriff's office obtaining the information pursuant to
this section.
(d) A law enforcement agency, any entity maintaining records of a law enforcement
agency, and the personnel of such law enforcement agency or entity providing or receiving access
to or copies of an applicant's personnel file pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section
shall not be held civilly or criminally liable for doing so."
PART VII. REINSTATE G.S. 102-1.1
SECTION 7. Section 2(a) of S.L. 2023-92 is repealed.
PART VIII. MILITARY JUDGES OF THE NCNG MODIFICATIONS
SECTION 8.(a) G.S. 127A-50 reads as rewritten:
"§ 127A-50. Summary courts-martial.
(a) In the North Carolina National Guard, not in the service of the United States, summary
courts-martial may be appointed by any of the following:
(1) Any person who may convene a general or special court-martial.
(2) The commander of a battalion, comparable or higher command of the North
Carolina Army National Guard, provided that the commander is an officer of
the grade of major or above.
(3) The commander of a detached squadron, comparable or higher command of
the North Carolina Air National Guard, provided that the commander is an
officer of the grade of major or above.
(b) The court shall consist of one officer who shall have the power to administer oaths
and try enlisted personnel of each respective command for breaches of discipline and violations
of laws governing those organizations.
(c) These courts The summary courts-martial officer shall also have the power to impose
punishments in like manner and to the extent prescribed by the Uniform Code of Military Justice
and Manual for Courts-Martial, United States, as shall be in use by the Armed Forces of the
United States at the time of the offense, except that no such court shall have the authority to
impose confinement as part of a sentence. There shall be no right to demand trial by general or
special court-martial.
(d) When the summary courts-martial officer is a military judge appointed under
G.S. 127A-50.1, the summary courts-martial officer shall have the enhanced punishment
authority to impose forfeitures of two-thirds pay for one month, to impose extra duty, to reduce
the rank of enlisted persons with a rank of E-7 or above by up to two ranks, and to reduce the
rank of enlisted persons with a rank of E-6 or below to the rank of E-1. No such court shall have
Page 20 Session Law 2025-51 Senate Bill 710

the authority to impose confinement as part of a sentence. There shall be no right to demand trial
by general or special court-martial."
SECTION 8.(b) G.S. 127A-50.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 127A-50.1. Military judges.
(a) The Adjutant General shall appoint military judges to preside over courts-martial of
the North Carolina National Guard not in federal service. Minimum requirements for
appointment as a military judge are:are as follows:
(1) Certification as a military judge by the Judge Advocate General of the United
States Army, Air Force, Navy, Marines, or Coast Guard.
(2) Designation as a judge advocate by the Judge Advocate General of the United
States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marines, or Coast Guard.
(3) Membership in the North Carolina National Guard, the National Guard of
another state, or the active or reserve components of the Armed Forces of the
United States.Guard.
(4) A member in good standing of the bar of the highest court of this State.
(5) Hold the rank of lieutenant colonel or above.
(b) The Adjutant General or the Staff Judge Advocate may detail military judges for all
purposes for which military judges may be detailed, except that only those certified as a military
judge by the Judge Advocate General of the United States Army, Air Force, Navy, Marines, or
Coast Guard may preside over a general or special court-martial.
(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude the detailing of a military judge from another
component of the Armed Forces of the United States made available for detail, provided that
such military judge has been certified by the Judge Advocate General from the military judge's
component of the Armed Forces of the United States. The Adjutant General shall detail such
military judge with the advice of the Staff Judge Advocate.
(d) Military judges for the Army National Guard and the Air National Guard may preside
over courts-martial of the other; provided, however, the Adjutant General shall obtain the advice
of the Staff Judge Advocate from the military judge's branch of service before the judge is
detailed.
(e) Military judges appointed by the Adjutant General may issue investigative subpoenas
as authorized under the Uniform Code of Military Justice and pursuant to such rules and
regulations as prescribed by the military judge's component of the Armed Forces of the United
States and as may be prescribed by the Adjutant General of the North Carolina National Guard.
Subpoenas issued under this section shall have the same force and effect as subpoenas issued by
the courts of this State. Subpoenas issued under this section may be served by a duly appointed
investigating officer, a North Carolina National Guard Provost Marshal or Deputy Provost
Marshal, or any sheriff, deputy sheriff, or State or local law enforcement officer."
SECTION 8.(c) G.S. 127A-56 reads as rewritten:
"§ 127A-56. Powers of courts-martial.
In the North Carolina National Guard, not in the service of the United States, presidents of
military judges certified by the Judge Advocate General of the United States Army, Air Force,
Navy, Marines, or Coast Guard and detailed to courts-martial and summary court officers shall
have power to issue warrants to arrest an accused person and to bring the person before a court
for trial whenever the person has disobeyed an order in writing from the convening authority to
appear before the court, a copy of the charge or charges having been delivered to the accused
with the order, and to issue subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum, and to enforce by attachment
attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, records and other articles subject to
a subpoena duces tecum, and to sentence for a refusal to be sworn or to answer as provided in
actions before civil courts. The presiding officer A certified military judge shall also have power
to punish for contempt occurring in the presence of the court."
SECTION 8.(d) G.S. 127A-57 reads as rewritten:
Senate Bill 710 Session Law 2025-51 Page 21

"§ 127A-57. Execution of processes and sentences.
All Except as otherwise provided in this Chapter, all warrants and other processes authorized
by this Chapter and sentences of any of the military courts of this State shall be executed by any
sheriff, deputy sheriff, or State or local law enforcement officer into whose hands they may be
placed for service or execution, and the officer shall make return thereof to the officer issuing or
imposing the same. The service or execution of process or sentence shall be made by the officer
without tender or advancement of fee therefor; but all costs in these cases shall be paid from
funds appropriated to the Department of Public Safety."
SECTION 8.(e) G.S. 127A-59 reads as rewritten:
"§ 127A-59. Sentences.
When any sentence to fine or imprisonment is imposed by any military court of this State, it
shall be the duty of the military judge, president of the court, or summary court officer, upon the
approval of the court's findings and sentence, to make out and sign a certificate entitling the case,
giving the name of the accused, the date and place of trial, the date of approval of sentence, and
the terms of the sentence. The trial counsel shall deliver the certificate to the Clerk of the Superior
Court of Wake County, and it shall thereupon be the duty of the clerk to take the actions necessary
to carry the sentence into execution in the same manner as prescribed by law for the collection
of fines, or commitment to service of terms of imprisonment, in criminal cases determined in the
courts of this State. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall ensure that the State's criminal
history records include pertinent information relating to a court-martial under this Chapter in a
like manner as a comparable offense under the State's criminal laws would be recorded."
SECTION 8.(f) G.S. 127A-60 reads as rewritten:
"§ 127A-60. Approval of sentence.
No sentence imposed by a special or general court-martial of the North Carolina National
Guard, not in the service of the United States, shall be executed until approved by the Governor.
The Governor may delegate this approval authority to the Adjutant General. Any officer
convicted by a general court-martial and dismissed from the service shall be forever disqualified
from holding a commission in the militia."
SECTION 8.(g) Section 8(a) of this Part is effective when it becomes law and applies
to summary courts-martial initiated on or after that date. Section 8(b) of this Part is effective
when it becomes law and applies to military judges serving on or after that date, except the
requirements of G.S. 127A-50.1, as amended by Section 8(b) of this Part, shall only apply to
appointments made on or after that date. Sections 8(c) and 8(d) of this Part are effective when
they become law and apply to warrants and orders issued on or after that date. The remainder of
this Part is effective when it becomes law.
PART IX. REVISOR OF STATUTES CONFORMING CHANGES
SECTION 9. The Revisor of Statutes may recodify the definitions in
G.S. 74C-13(a1) so that they appear in alphabetical order and shall make any necessary
conforming changes.
Page 22 Session Law 2025-51 Senate Bill 710

PART X. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 10. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 26th day of June, 2025.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Destin Hall
Speaker of the House of Representatives
s/ Josh Stein
Governor
Approved 12:42 p.m. this 2nd day of July, 2025
Senate Bill 710 Session Law 2025-51 Page 23